Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1329.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 19 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 19. Duration and Renewal of Licenses.--* * *(d) Renewal of the professional and teaching licenses under this act shall require ten hours of continuing education per biannual renewal period, with a minimum of eight hours in professional skills and techniques, one hour in health and sanitation and one hour in legal matters, regulatory matters or 12345678910111213141516171819202122 ethics. Hours shall be submitted upon application for renewal. The subject matter of the continuing education course shall match the scope of practice of the license held. A provider of continuing education under this act must be approved by the board.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1329PN1718 - 2 - 123456